Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1477.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2709.1(c)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2709.1. Stalking.* * *(c) Grading.--* * *(2) A second or subsequent offense under this section or a first offense under subsection (a) if the person has been previously convicted of a crime of violence involving the same victim, family or household member, including, but not limited to, a violation of section 2701 (relating to simple assault), 2702 (relating to aggravated assault), 2705 123456789101112131415161718 (relating to recklessly endangering another person), 2718 (relating to strangulation), 2901 (relating to kidnapping), 3121 (relating to rape) or 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse), an order issued under section 4954 (relating to protective orders) or an order issued under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 (relating to relief) shall constitute a felony of the [third] second degree.(c.1 ) Sentencing.-- (1) A person convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this section shall be sentenced to a minimum sentence of at least five years of total confinement.(2) Notwithstanding section 1103 (relating to sentence of imprisonment for felony), an offender sentenced to a mandatory minimum sentence under this section shall be sentenced to a maximum sentence equal to twice the mandatory minimum sentence.(3) The following apply to proof at sentencing:(i) Provisions of this section shall not be an element of the crime.(ii) Notice to the defendant of the provisions of this section shall not be required prior to conviction.(iii) Reasonable notice of the Commonwealth's intention to proceed under this section shall be provided after conviction and before sentencing.(iv) The applicability of this section shall be determined at sentencing.(v) The sentencing court, prior to imposing sentence on an offender under paragraph (1), shall have a complete record of the previous convictions of the offender, copies of which shall be furnished to the offender. The 20250HB1477PN2268 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following apply:(A) If the offender or the attorney for the Commonwealth contests the accuracy of the record, the court shall schedule a hearing and direct the offender and the attorney for the Commonwealth to submit evidence regarding the previous convictions of the offender.(B) The court shall then determine, by a preponderance of the evidence, the previous convictions of the offender and, if this section is applicable, shall impose sentence in accordance with this section.(C) If a previous conviction is vacated and an acquittal or final discharge is entered subsequent to imposition of sentence under this section, the offender shall have the right to petition the sentencing court for reconsideration of sentence if this section would not have been applicable except for the conviction which was vacated.(4) With respect to an offender to which this section is applicable, a sentencing court may not:(i) Impose on the offender a lesser sentence than is provided under paragraphs (1) and (2).(ii) Place the offender on probation or suspend the sentence of the offender.(5) Nothing in this section shall prevent a sentencing court from imposing a sentence greater than that provided in this section.(6) Sentencing guidelines promulgated by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing shall not supersede the 20250HB1477PN2268 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mandatory sentences provided in this section.(7) I f a sentencing court refuses to apply this section as applicable, the Commonwealth shall have the right to appellate review of the action of the sentencing court. The appellate court shall vacate the sentence and remand the case to the sentencing court for the imposition of a sentence in accordance with this section if the appellate court finds that the sentence was imposed in violation of this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1477PN2268 - 4 - 12345678910